New Jersey, session 222, S3750.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, online program manager means an entity that enters into a contract or agreement related exclusively to online degree and certificate program delivery, including online programs with required in-person clinical and other instruction with an institution of higher education or proprietary degree-granting institution to provide one or more of the following services on behalf of the institution in exchange for financial compensation: advertising and marketing services; recruiting, admissions, and financial services; instruction services; student support services; technology resources and support services; and curriculum development services. b.    An institution of higher education or proprietary degree-granting institution that enters into an agreement with an online program manager shall make publicly available on its website the following information on the online programs that are supported by the online program manager: (1)   the name of the online program manager contracted by the institution; (2)   the admission requirements; (3)   the online programs tuition costs compared to on-campus program tuition costs; (4)   the financial aid available for the online program; (5)   the average financial aid amount provided to students in the online program; and (6)   the percentage of students in the online program that receive financial aid. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.